Hawaii, session 2026, SB367.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 286-26, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (e) to read as follows: "(e)  Upon application for a certificate of inspection to be issued for a vehicle or moped, an inspection as prescribed by the director under subsection (g) shall be conducted on the vehicle or moped, and if the vehicle or moped is found to be in a safe operating condition, including adhering to head lamp requirements and specifications pursuant to section 291-25(a), as applicable, a certificate of inspection shall be issued upon payment of a fee to be determined by the director[.]; provided that no certificate of inspection shall be issued if the vehicle or moped is found to have a muffler that has been altered, installed, or otherwise modified in any way which will noticeably increase the noise emitted by the motor vehicle or moped above that emitted by the motor vehicle or moped as equipped from the factory.  The certificate shall state the effective date, the termination date, the name of the issuing insurance carrier, the policy number of the motor vehicle insurance identification card for the inspected motor vehicle as specified by section 431:10C-107 or state the information contained in the proof of insurance card as specified by section 431:10G-106, and the odometer reading of the vehicle on the date of inspection.  A sticker, authorized by the director, shall be affixed to the vehicle or moped at the time a certificate of inspection is issued.  An inspection sticker that has been lost, stolen, or destroyed shall be replaced without reinspection by the inspection station that issued the original inspection sticker upon presentation of the current certificate of inspection; provided that the current certificate of inspection and inspection sticker shall not have expired at the time the replacement is requested.  The director shall adopt rules to determine the fee for replacement of lost, stolen, or destroyed inspection stickers. " SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________